California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(h) (1) At the review held pursuant to subdivision (d) for a child in foster care, the court shall consider all permanency planning options for the child including whether the child should be returned to the home of the parent, placed for adoption, or, for an Indian child, in consultation with the child’s tribe, placed for tribal customary adoption, or appointed a legal guardian, placed with a fit and willing relative, or, if compelling reasons exist for finding that none of the foregoing options are in the best interest of the child and the child is 16 years of age or older, whether the child should be placed in another planned permanent living arrangement. The court shall order that a hearing be held pursuant to Section 366.26, unless it determines by clear and convincing evidence that there is a compelling reason for
 determining that a hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26 is not in the best interest of the child because the child is being returned to the home of the parent, the child is not a proper subject for adoption, or no one is willing to accept legal guardianship as of the hearing date. If the county adoption agency, or the department when it is acting as an adoption agency, has determined it is unlikely that the child will be adopted or one of the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 366.26 applies, that fact shall constitute a compelling reason for purposes of this subdivision. Only upon that determination may the court order that the child remain in foster care, without holding a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26. The court shall make factual findings identifying any barriers to achieving the permanent plan as of the hearing date. The nonminor dependent’s legal status
 as an adult is in and of itself a compelling reason not to hold a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26.

(2) When the child is 16 years of age or older and in another planned permanent living arrangement, the court shall do all of the following:

(A) Ask the child about their desired permanency outcome.

(B) Make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the hearing date, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child.

(C) State for the record the compelling reason or reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed for tribal customary adoption in the
 case of an Indian child, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.

(3) When the child is 16 years of age or older and is in another planned permanent living arrangement, the social study prepared for the hearing shall include a description of all of the following:

(A) The intensive and ongoing efforts to return the child to the home of the parent, place the child for adoption, or establish a legal guardianship, as appropriate.

(B) The steps taken to do both of the following:

(i) Ensure that the child’s care provider is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(ii) Determine whether the child has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities, including consulting with the child about opportunities for the child to participate in those activities.

(4) When the child is under 16 years of age and has a permanent plan of return home, adoption, legal guardianship, or placement with a fit and willing relative, the social study shall include a description of any barriers to achieving the permanent plan and the efforts made by the agency to address those barriers.

(i) If, as authorized by subdivision (h), the court orders a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26, the court shall direct the agency supervising the child and the county adoption agency, or the State Department of Social Services when it
 is acting as an adoption agency, to prepare an assessment, as provided for in subdivision (i) of Section 366.21 or subdivision (c) of Section 366.22. A
 hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26 shall be held no later than 120 days from the date of the 12-month review at which it is ordered, and at that hearing the court shall determine whether adoption, tribal customary adoption, legal guardianship, placement with a fit and willing relative, or, for a child 16 years of age or older, another planned permanent living arrangement is the most appropriate plan for the child. On and after January 1, 2012, a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 shall not be ordered if the child is a nonminor dependent, unless the nonminor dependent is an Indian child and tribal customary adoption is recommended as the permanent plan. The court may order that a nonminor dependent who otherwise is eligible pursuant to Section 11403 remain in a planned, permanent living arrangement. At the request of the nonminor dependent who has an established relationship with an adult
 determined to be the nonminor dependent’s permanent connection, the court may order adoption of the nonminor
 dependent pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31.

(j) The reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) may be conducted earlier than every six months if the court determines that an earlier review is in the best interests of the child or as court rules prescribe.

(k) On and after October 1, 2021, for reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) for the child whose placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program has been reviewed and approved and, on and after July 1, 2022, for reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) for the child whose placement in a community treatment facility has been reviewed and approved, pursuant to Section 361.22, the report prepared for the review shall include evidence of all of the following:

(1) Ongoing assessment of the strengths and needs of the child continues to support the determination that the needs of the child cannot be met by family members or in another family-based setting, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, continues to provide the most effective and appropriate care setting in the least restrictive environment, and the placement is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the child.

(2) Documentation of the child’s specific treatment or service needs that will be met in the placement and the length of time the child is expected to need the treatment or services. For a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the determination of services and
 expected length of time for those services funded by Medi-Cal shall be based upon medical necessity and on all other state and federal Medi-Cal requirements, and shall be reflected in the documentation.

(3) Documentation of the intensive and ongoing efforts made by the child welfare department, consistent with the child’s permanency plan, to prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, an adoptive parent, in a resource family home or tribally approved home, or in another appropriate family-based setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 127.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

366.31.

(a) If a review hearing is the last review hearing to be held before the child attains 18 years of age, the court shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The child’s case plan includes a plan for the child to satisfy one or more of the participation conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, so that the child is eligible to remain in foster care as a nonminor dependent.

(2) The child has been informed of their right to seek termination of dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391, and understands the potential benefits of continued dependency.

(3) The child is informed of their right to have dependency reinstated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388, and understands the potential benefits of continued dependency.

(b) At the review hearing that occurs in the six-month period before the child attains 18 years of age, and at every subsequent review hearing for the nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, the report shall describe all of the following:

(1) The child’s and nonminor dependent’s plans to remain in foster care and plans to meet one or more of the participation conditions as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 to continue to receive AFDC-FC benefits as a nonminor
 dependent.

(2) The efforts made and assistance provided to the child and nonminor dependent by the social worker or the probation officer so that the child and nonminor dependent will be able to meet the participation conditions.

(3) Efforts toward completing the items described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 391.

(4) On and after October 1, 2021, for a child or nonminor dependent whose placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program has been reviewed and approved, and, on and after July 1, 2022, for a child or nonminor dependent whose placement in a community treatment facility has been reviewed and approved, pursuant to Section 361.22, the report prepared for the review shall include
 evidence of all of the following:

(A) Ongoing assessment of the strengths and needs of the child or nonminor dependent continues to support the determination that the needs of the child or nonminor dependent cannot be met by family members or in another family-based setting, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, continues to provide the most effective and appropriate care setting in the least restrictive environment, and placement is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the child or nonminor dependent.

(B) Documentation of the child or nonminor dependent’s specific treatment or service needs that will be met in the placement and the length of time the
 child or nonminor dependent is expected to need the treatment or services. For a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the determination of services and expected length of time for those services funded by Medi-Cal shall be based upon medical necessity and on all other state and federal Medi-Cal requirements, and shall be reflected in the documentation.

(C) Documentation of the intensive and ongoing efforts made by the child welfare department, consistent with the child or nonminor dependent’s permanency plan, to prepare the child or nonminor dependent to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, an adoptive parent, in a resource family home, a tribally approved home, or in another appropriate family-based setting, or, in the case of a nonminor dependent, in a supervised independent living setting.

(5) (A) For a child or nonminor dependent in high school who has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, the information in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(B) (i) Whether the social worker or probation officer has informed the minor or nonminor dependent of the information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(ii) This paragraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.

(6) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified
 the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(c) The reviews conducted pursuant to this section for a nonminor dependent shall be conducted in a manner that respects the nonminor’s status as a legal adult, focused on the goals and services described in the youth’s transitional independent living case plan, as described in subdivision (y) of Section 11400, including whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county, efforts made to maintain connections with caring and permanently committed adults, and attended, as appropriate, by additional
 participants invited by the nonminor dependent.

(d) For a nonminor dependent whose case plan is continued court-ordered family reunification services pursuant to Section 361.6, the court shall consider whether the nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian. If the nonminor cannot reside safely in the home of the parent or guardian or if it is not in the nonminor dependent’s best interest to reside in the home of the parent or guardian, the court must consider whether to continue or terminate reunification services for the parent or legal guardian and whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county.

(1) The review report shall include a discussion of all of the following:

(A) Whether foster care placement continues to be necessary and appropriate.

(B) The likely date by which the nonminor dependent may reside safely in the home of the parent or guardian or will achieve independence.

(C) Whether the parent or guardian and nonminor dependent were actively involved in the development of the case plan.

(D) Whether the social worker or probation officer has provided reasonable services designed to aid the parent or guardian to overcome the problems that led to the initial removal of the nonminor dependent.

(E) The extent of progress the parents or guardian have made toward
 alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.

(F) Whether the nonminor dependent and parent, parents, or guardian are in agreement with the continuation of reunification services.

(G) Whether continued reunification services are in the best interest of the nonminor dependent.

(H) Whether there is a substantial probability that the nonminor dependent will be able to safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian by the next review hearing date.

(I) The efforts to maintain the nonminor’s connections with caring and permanently committed adults.

(J) The agency’s
 compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including efforts to finalize the nonminor’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.

(K) The progress in providing the information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391.

(L) (i) For a nonminor dependent in high school who has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, the information in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(ii) Whether the social worker or probation officer has informed the nonminor dependent of the information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(iii) This subparagraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.

(M) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education including career or technical education.

(2) The court shall inquire about the progress being made to
 provide a permanent home for the nonminor, shall consider the safety of the nonminor dependent, and shall determine all of the following:

(A) The continuing necessity for, and appropriateness of, the placement. If the child or nonminor dependent is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after October 1, 2021, or is placed in a community treatment facility on or after July 1, 2022, the court shall consider the evidence and documentation submitted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) in making this determination.

(B) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts to maintain relationships between the nonminor dependent and individuals who are important to the nonminor dependent.

(C) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts or, in the case of an Indian child, active efforts, as described in Section 361.7, to create a safe home of the parent or guardian for the nonminor to reside in or to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the nonminor dependent.

(D) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including efforts to finalize the youth’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.

(E) The adequacy of services provided to the parent or guardian and to the nonminor dependent. The court shall consider the progress in providing the information and documents to the nonminor
 dependent as described in Section 391. The court shall also consider the need for, and progress in providing, the assistance and services described in Section 391.

(F) The extent of progress the parents or legal guardians have made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.

(G) The likely date by which the nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian or, if the court is terminating reunification services, the likely date by which it is anticipated the nonminor dependent will achieve independence, or, for an Indian child, in consultation with the child’s tribe, placed for tribal customary adoption.

(H) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts as
 required in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366 to establish or maintain the nonminor dependent’s relationship with their siblings who are under the juvenile court’s jurisdiction.

(I) The services needed to assist the nonminor dependent to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(J) Whether or not reasonable efforts to make and finalize a permanent placement for the nonminor dependent have been made.

(K) (i) If the nonminor dependent is in high school and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, whether the social worker or probation officer has taken the actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 366.

(ii) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.

(L) (i) Whether the social worker or probation officer has,
 pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(ii) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.

(3) If the court determines that a nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or former guardian, the court may order the nonminor dependent to return to the family home. After the
 nonminor dependent returns to the family home, the court may terminate jurisdiction and proceed under applicable provisions of Section 391 or continue jurisdiction as a nonminor under subdivision (a) of Section 303 and hold hearings as follows:

(A) At every hearing for a nonminor dependent residing in the home of the parent or guardian, the court shall set a hearing within six months of the previous hearing. The court shall advise the parties of their right to be present. At least 10 calendar days before the hearing, the social worker or probation officer shall file a report with the court describing the services offered to the family and the progress made by the family in eliminating the conditions or factors requiring court supervision. The report shall address all of the following:

(i) Whether the parent or guardian and the nonminor dependent were actively involved in the development of the case plan.

(ii) Whether the social worker or probation officer has provided reasonable services to eliminate the need for court supervision.

(iii) The progress of providing information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391.

(B) The court shall inquire about progress being made, shall consider the safety of the nonminor dependent, and shall determine all of the following:

(i) The continuing need for court supervision.

(ii) The extent of the agency’s
 compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts to maintain a safe family home for the nonminor dependent.

(C) If the court finds that court supervision is no longer necessary, the court shall terminate jurisdiction under applicable
 provisions of Section 391.

(e) For a nonminor dependent who is no longer receiving court-ordered family reunification services and is in a permanent plan of another planned permanent living arrangement, at the review hearing held every six months pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3, the reviewing body shall inquire about the progress being made to provide permanent connections with caring, committed adults for the nonminor dependent, shall consider the safety of the nonminor, shall consider the transitional independent living case plan, and whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county, and shall determine all of the following:

(1) The continuing necessity for, and appropriateness of, the placement.

(2) The continuing appropriateness and extent of compliance with the permanent plan for the nonminor dependent, including efforts to identify and maintain relationships with individuals who are important to the nonminor dependent.

(3) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including whether or not reasonable efforts have been made to make and finalize the youth’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.

(4) Whether a prospective adoptive parent has been identified and assessed as appropriate for the nonminor dependent’s adoption under this section, whether the prospective adoptive parent has been informed about the terms
 of the written negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to Section 16120, and whether adoption should be ordered as the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan. If nonminor dependent adoption is ordered as the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan, a hearing pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be held within 60 days. When the court orders a hearing pursuant to subdivision (f), it shall direct the agency to prepare a report that shall include the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (f).

(5) For the nonminor dependent who is an Indian child, whether, in consultation with the nonminor’s tribe, the nonminor should be placed for tribal customary adoption.

(6) The adequacy of services provided to the nonminor dependent. The court shall consider the progress in providing the information
 and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391. The court shall also consider the need for, and progress in providing, the assistance and services described in Section 391.

(7) The likely date by which it is anticipated the nonminor dependent will achieve adoption or independence.

(8) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts as required in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366 to establish or maintain the nonminor dependent’s relationship with their siblings who are under the juvenile court’s jurisdiction.

(9) The services needed to assist the nonminor dependent to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(10) When the hearing described in this subdivision is held pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 366.3, and the nonminor dependent has a permanent plan of another planned permanent living arrangement, the court shall do all of the following:

(A) Ask the nonminor dependent about their desired permanency outcome.

(B) Make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the hearing date, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the nonminor dependent.

(C) State for the record the compelling reason or reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the nonminor dependent to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed for tribal customary
 adoption in the case of an Indian child, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.

(11) (A) If the nonminor dependent is in high school and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, whether the social worker or probation officer has taken the actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.

(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this paragraph.

(12) (A) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of
 Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.

(f) (1) At a hearing to consider a permanent plan of adoption for a nonminor dependent, the court shall read and consider the report in paragraph (5) and receive other evidence that the parties may present. A copy of the executed negotiated agreement shall be
 attached to the report. If the court finds pursuant to this section that nonminor dependent adoption is the appropriate permanent plan, it shall make findings and orders to do the following:

(A) Approve the adoption agreement and declare the nonminor dependent is the adopted child of the adoptive parent, and that the nonminor dependent and adoptive parents agree to assume toward each other the legal relationship of parents and child and to have all of the rights and be subject to all of the duties and responsibilities of that relationship.

(B) Declare that the birth parents of the nonminor dependent are, from the time of the adoption, relieved of all parental duties toward, and responsibility for, the adopted nonminor dependent and have no rights over the adopted nonminor dependent.

(2) If the court finds that the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent have mutually consented to the adoption, the court may enter the adoption order after it determines all of the following:

(A) Whether the notice was given as required by law.

(B) Whether the nonminor dependent and prospective adoptive parent are present for the hearing.

(C) Whether the court has read and considered the assessment prepared by the social worker or probation officer.

(D) Whether the court considered the wishes of the nonminor dependent.

(E) If the nonminor dependent is eligible, the prospective adoptive parent has signed the negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16120, and whether a copy of the executed negotiated agreement is attached to the report.

(F) Whether the adoption is in the best interest of the nonminor dependent.

(3) If the court orders the establishment of the nonminor dependent adoption, it shall dismiss dependency or transitional jurisdiction.

(4) If the court does not order the establishment of the nonminor dependent adoption, the nonminor dependent shall remain in a planned permanent living arrangement subject to periodic review of the juvenile court pursuant to this section.

(5) At least 10 calendar days before the hearing, the social worker or probation officer shall file a report with the court and provide a copy of the report to all parties. The report shall describe the following:

(A) Whether or not the nonminor dependent has any developmental disability and whether the proposed adoptive parent is suitable to meet the needs of the nonminor dependent.

(B) The length and nature of the relationship between the prospective adoptive parent and the nonminor dependent, including whether the prospective adoptive parent has been determined to have been established as the nonminor’s permanent connection.

(C) Whether the nonminor dependent
 has been determined to be eligible for the adoption assistance program and, if so, whether the prospective adoptive parent has signed the negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16120.

(D) Whether a copy of the executed negotiated agreement is attached to the report.

(E) Whether criminal background clearances were completed for the prospective adoptive parent as required by Section 671(a)(20)(A) and (a)(20)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(F) Whether the prospective adoptive parent who is married and not legally separated from that spouse has the consent of the spouse, provided that the spouse is capable of giving that consent.

(G) Whether the adoption of the nonminor dependent is in the best interests of the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent.

(H) Whether the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent have mutually consented to the adoption.

(6) The social worker or probation officer shall serve written notice of the hearing in the manner and to the persons set forth in Section 295, including the prospective adoptive parent or parents, except that notice to the nonminor’s birth parents is not required.

(7) Nothing in this section shall prevent a nonminor dependent from filing an adoption petition pursuant to Section 9300 of the Family Code.

(g) Each licensed foster family agency shall submit reports for each nonminor dependent in its care to the court concerning the continuing appropriateness and extent of compliance with the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan, the extent of compliance with the transitional independent living case plan, and the type and adequacy of services provided to the nonminor dependent. The report shall document that the nonminor has received all the information and documentation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 391. If the court is considering terminating dependency jurisdiction for a nonminor dependent it shall first hold a hearing pursuant to Section 391.

(h) When the nonminor dependent is in another planned permanent living arrangement, the social study prepared for the hearing held under subdivision (e) shall
 include a description of all of the following:

(1) The intensive and ongoing efforts to return the nonminor dependent to the home of the parent, place the nonminor dependent for adoption, or place the nonminor dependent with a fit and willing relative, as appropriate.

(2) The steps taken to do both of the following:

(A) Ensure that the nonminor dependent’s care provider is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(B) Determine whether the nonminor dependent has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age- or developmentally appropriate activities, including consulting with the nonminor dependent about opportunities for the nonminor
 dependent to participate in those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 281, Sec. 2.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

366.32.

(a) With respect to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who has a permanent plan of long-term foster care that was ordered pursuant to Section 366.21, 366.22, 366.25, or 366.26, the court may continue jurisdiction of the nonminor as a nonminor dependent of the juvenile court or may dismiss dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391.

(b) If the court continues dependency jurisdiction of the nonminor as a nonminor dependent of the juvenile court, the court shall order the development of a planned permanent living arrangement under a mutual agreement, as described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, which may include continued placement with the current caregiver or another licensed or approved caregiver or
 in a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, consistent with the youth’s Transitional Independent Living Case Plan. At the request of the nonminor dependent who has an established relationship with an adult determined to be the nonminor dependent’s permanent connection, the court may order nonminor dependent adoption pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31 as the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan.

(c) If the court terminates its dependency jurisdiction over a nonminor dependent pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall retain general jurisdiction over the youth pursuant to Section 303. If the court has dismissed dependency jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 391, the nonminor, who has not attained 21 years of age, may subsequently file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to have dependency jurisdiction resumed and the court may vacate its previous order
 dismissing dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor dependent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 27.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

366.35.

(a) The implementation and operation of the amendments to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366, subdivision (g) of Section 366.1, subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 366.21, subdivision (a) of Section 366.22, subdivision (a) of Section 366.25, paragraph (3) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of, subdivision (c) of Section 366.26, paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 366.3, and subdivision (i) of Section 16501.1 enacted at the 2005–06 Regular Session shall be phased in, consistent with the child’s best interests, as follows:

(1) The first phase of expansion shall apply to a child who is 10 years of age or older and placed with a nonrelative for six months or longer.

(2) The second phase of expansion shall apply to a child who is 10 years of age or older and placed with a nonrelative or in permanent placement relative care for six months or longer.

(3) The final phase of expansion shall apply to a child who is 10 years of age or older and who has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer.

(b) All phases of subdivision (a) shall be subject to appropriation through the budget process. Those appropriations shall apply only to the state’s share of costs. Counties shall remain responsible for their nonfederal share of costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 482, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

366.4.

(a) Any minor for whom a guardianship has been established resulting from the selection or implementation of a permanency plan pursuant to Section 366.26, or for whom a related guardianship has been established pursuant to Section 360, or, on and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, a nonminor who is receiving Kin-GAP payments pursuant to Section 11363 or 11386, or, on or after January 1, 2012, a nonminor former dependent child of the juvenile court who is receiving AFDC-FC benefits pursuant to Section 11405, is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. For those minors, Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Probate Code, relating to guardianship, shall not apply. If no specific provision of this code or the
 California Rules of Court is applicable, the provisions applicable to the administration of estates under Part 4 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 4 of the Probate Code govern so far as they are applicable to like situations.

(b) Nonrelated legal guardians of the person of a guardianship pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26 shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 2850 and 2851 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 9.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

366.5.

The dependency jurisdiction shall be suspended for a child whom the juvenile court declares to be a dual status child based on the joint assessment and recommendation of the county probation department and the child welfare services department pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 241.1. The suspension shall be in effect while the child is a ward of the court. If the jurisdiction established pursuant to Section 601 or 602 is terminated without the need for continued dependency proceedings concerning the child, the juvenile court shall terminate the child’s dual status. If the termination of the Section 601 or 602 jurisdiction is likely and reunification of the child with his or her parent or guardian would be detrimental to the child, the county probation department and child welfare services department shall jointly assess and produce a recommendation regarding whether the court’s dependency jurisdiction shall be resumed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 468, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

367.

(a) Whenever a person has been adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court and has been committed or otherwise disposed of as provided in this chapter for the care of dependent children of the juvenile court, the court may order that the dependent child be detained in a suitable place designated as the court deems fit until the execution of the order of commitment or of other disposition.

(b) In any case in which a child is detained for more than 15 days pending the execution of the order of commitment or of any other disposition, the court shall periodically review the case to determine whether the delay is reasonable. These periodic reviews shall be held at least every 15 days, commencing from the time the child was initially detained pending the execution of the order of commitment or of any other disposition, and during the course of each review the court shall inquire regarding the action taken by the social worker to carry out its order, the reasons for the delay, and the effect of the delay upon the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

368.
